Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 66. Title Insurance Companies.
Sec. 21.66.450.
Forms of policies and other contracts of title insurance.

Each title insurance company shall file with the director all forms of title policies and other contracts of title insurance that it proposes to issue in this state before their issuance; however, in no event may a title insurance company issue a form of policy or contract before 30 days after it has been filed with the director, unless it has received earlier approval by the director. Unless the director disapproves a form of title policy or contract of title insurance within 30 days from the date of its filing, the filing is considered to be approved.

Forms of title policies and other contracts of insurance, as used in this section, are considered to include preliminary reports of title, binders for insurance, commitments to insure, and policies of insurance or guaranty, together with all the terms and conditions of insurance coverage or guaranty that relate to title to any interest in property, offered by a title insurance company. Forms of title policies and other contracts of insurance shall specifically exclude

reinsurance contracts or agreements;

all specific defects in title that may be ascertained from an examination of the risk and excepted in such reports, binder, commitments, or policies, together with any affirmative assurances of the title insurance company with respect to the defects whether given by endorsement or otherwise; and

further exceptions from coverage by reason of limitations upon the examination of the risk imposed by an applicant for insurance or through failure of an applicant for insurance to provide the data requisite to a judgment of insurability.

History.

(§ 6 ch 120 SLA 1974)

Administrative Code. —

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.66.460.
Filing required for escrow, settlement, and closing charges.

Each title insurance company shall file with the director a schedule of the escrow, settlement, and closing charges that it proposes to use in this state for these services when performed in connection with the issuance of policies of title insurance. The filing must state the effective date of the schedule, which shall be not less than 30 days after the date of filing with the director.

All or any part of the schedule may be amended at any time. Each amendment shall be filed with the director, and shall state its effective date, which must be not less than 30 days after the date of its filing with the director.

Copies of schedules filed under this section shall be retained in each of the offices of a title insurance company in this state, and, upon request shall be furnished to the public.

A title insurance company may not make or impose a charge for escrow, settlement, or closing services when performed in connection with the issuance of a policy of title insurance except in accordance with the schedule of the charges filed with the director under this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 120 SLA 1974)

Sec. 21.66.470.
Other sections applicable.

The provisions of this title governing insurance companies, except to the extent that they are inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, apply to the business of title insurance and to title insurance companies.

History.

(§ 6 ch 120 SLA 1974)

Sec. 21.66.480.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“applicants for insurance” means those persons, whether or not prospectively insured, who apply to a title insurance company or to its agent, for title insurance, and who at the time of the application are not agents for a title insurance company;

“business of title insurance” is

the making or proposing to make as insurer, guarantor, or surety, a contract or policy of title insurance; or

the transacting or proposing to transact, any phase of title insurance including solicitation, negotiation preliminary to execution, execution of a title insurance contract, and insuring and transacting matters subsequent to the execution of the contract and arising out of it, including reinsurance;

“net retained liability” means the total liability retained by a title insurance company under a policy or contract of insurance, or under a single insurance risk as defined in or computed in accordance with (5) of this section, less the amount of reinsurance ceded;

“rate” means a charge for title insurance risk, abstracting, searching, examination or determination of insurability, and every other activity, exclusive of escrow, settlement, or closing charges, whether denominated premium or otherwise, made by a title insurance company or an agent of a title insurance company to an insured or to an applicant for insurance, for a policy or contract of title insurance; however, “rate” does not include charges paid to and retained by an attorney at law, abstractor, surveyor, tax service, or any other person acting in a capacity other than as a title insurance limited producer and on behalf of a client other than a title insurance company, or charges made for special services, even though performed in connection with a title insurance policy or contract;

“single insurance risk” means the insured amount of a policy or contract of title insurance issued by a title insurance company unless two or more policies or contracts are simultaneously issued on different estates in identical real property, in which case, it means the sum of the insured amounts of all of the policies or contracts; however, any policy or contract that insures a mortgage interest that is excepted in a fee or leasehold policy or contract, and that does not exceed the insured amount of the fee or leasehold policy or contract, is excluded in computing the amount of a single insurance risk;

“title insurance” means insuring, guaranteeing, or indemnifying owners of real or personal property or the holders of liens or encumbrances on it or others interested therein against loss or damage suffered by reason of

liens, encumbrances upon, defects in, or the unmarketability of the title to the property; or

the invalidity or unenforceability of liens or encumbrances on the property;

“title insurance company” means a domestic company organized under the provisions of this title for the purpose of carrying on the business of title insurance, or any foreign title insurance company issued a certificate of authority to transact a title insurance business in this state and any title insurance company having the power and authority to transact a title insurance business within this state;

“title insurance limited producer” means a person, firm, association, trust, corporation, cooperative, joint-stock company, or other legal entity authorized in writing by a title insurance company to solicit title insurance, collect premiums, determine insurability in accordance with the underwriting rules and standards prescribed by the title insurance company that the licensee represents, and issue policies in its behalf.

History.

(§ 6 ch 120 SLA 1974; am § 18 ch 21 SLA 1985; am §§ 182 —184 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 43 ch 80 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1993 to alphabetize the defined terms.